South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3284.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-1538(I)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) "Emergency services personnel" means fire, police, or emergency medical services personnel (EMS), or tow truck operators responding to an emergency incident. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----